Washington statutes.
RCW 19.186.005

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that many homeowners are solicited by siding and roofing contractors to purchase home improvements. Some contractors misrepresent the financing terms or the cost of the improvements, preventing the homeowner from making an informed decision about whether the improvements are affordable. The result is that many homeowners face financial hardship including the loss of their homes through foreclosure. The legislature declares that this is a matter of public interest. It is the intent of the legislature to establish rules of business practice for roofing and siding contractors to promote honesty and fair dealing with homeowners.

[ 1994 c 285 s 1.]